Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-8,183.01
Professional Landscape Architects Act, how cited.

Sections 81-8,183.01 to 81-8,208 shall be known and may be cited as the Professional Landscape Architects Act.

Laws 1967, c. 565, § 25, p. 1867;

Laws 1984, LB 477, § 15;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 81-8,208;

Laws 2012, LB1140, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB30, § 1.